Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 4. Protection of Property of Persons Under Disability and Minors.
Sec. 13.26.515.
Visitor reports.

The initial visitor report of a visitor appointed under AS

13.26.430(b)

must include

the results and analyses of medical and other tests and examinations performed that describe the proposed protected person’s mental, emotional, physical, and educational condition, adaptive behavior, and social skills, and that specify the data on which the description is based;

recommendations regarding the types and extent of assistance, if any, necessary to meet the essential requirements for managing the property and affairs of the proposed protected person;

an evaluation of the proposed protected person’s need for mental health treatment and whether there is a substantial probability that available treatment will significantly improve the proposed protected person’s mental condition;

an evaluation of the proposed protected person’s need for educational or vocational assistance and whether the assistance can be made available to the protected person;

an evaluation of the probability that the incapacity may significantly lessen, and the type of services or treatment that will facilitate improvement in the condition or skills of the proposed protected person;

a list of the names and addresses of all individuals who examined, interviewed, or investigated the proposed protected person, and the names and addresses of all persons contacted in preparation of the visitor report;

a summary of the information that

was supplied by the person described in (6) of this subsection; and

supports the conclusions of the visitor report;

a description of the alternatives to conservatorship that were considered and not recommended and an explanation of why they are not feasible to meet the needs of the proposed protected person;

a specification of the financial resources of the proposed protected person, the proposed protected person’s entitlements to insurance benefits, and publicly operated or sponsored health, mental health, and welfare assistance that might be employed in the provision of services to the proposed protected person; and

if conservatorship is recommended, a conservatorship outline that identifies

potential conservators;

the specific services necessary and available to protect the proposed protected person from serious damage to the proposed protected person’s property and affairs;

the means by which the services described in (B) of this paragraph may be financed;

the specific, least restrictive authority needed by the conservator to provide the services described in (B) of this paragraph.

In addition to any initial visitor report provided under (a) of this section, every third year, the court may appoint a visitor to file a report reviewing the conservatorship during the period since the last visitor report, if any.

In addition to the reports under (a) and (b) of this section, at any time during a conservatorship, a court may appoint a visitor to file a report reviewing the conservatorship during the period since the last visitor report, if any.

A visitor report provided under (b) or (c) of this section must include

the name and address of the protected person and the conservator;

the services being provided to the protected person by or through the conservator;

the significant actions taken by the conservator during the reporting period in regard to the protected person;

a financial accounting of the estate that has been subject to the possession or control of the conservator;

a list of the number and nature of the contacts between the conservator and the protected person if the protected person does not reside with the conservator;

any other information requested by the court or necessary or desirable in the opinion of the visitor.

History.

(§ 24 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.257

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.430(b)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.195(b)”.

Sec. 13.26.520.
Conservators; title by appointment.

The appointment of a conservator vests in the conservator title as trustee to all property of the protected person, presently held or thereafter acquired, including title to any property theretofore held for the protected person by custodians or attorneys-in-fact.
The appointment of a conservator is not a transfer or alienation within the meaning of general provisions of any federal or state statute or regulation, insurance policy, pension plan, contract, will or trust instrument, imposing restrictions upon or penalties for transfer or alienation by the protected person of any rights or interest, but this section does not restrict the ability of persons to make specific provision by contract or dispositive instrument relating to a conservator.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.260; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.525.
Recording of conservator’s letters.

Letters of conservatorship are evidence of transfer of all assets of a protected person to the conservator.
An order terminating a conservatorship is evidence of transfer of all assets of the estate from the conservator to the protected person, or the protected person’s successors. Subject to the requirements of general statutes governing the recordation of documents of title to land or other property, letters of conservatorship, and orders terminating conservatorships, may be recorded to give record notice of title as between the conservator and the protected person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in this section in 1988 under sec. 42, ch. 161, SLA 1988.

Formerly AS

13.26.265

; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For recording laws, see AS 40.17.

Sec. 13.26.530.
Sale, encumbrance, or transaction involving conflict of interest voidable.

Any sale or encumbrance to a conservator, the conservator’s spouse, agent, or attorney, or any corporation or trust in which the conservator has a substantial beneficial interest, or any transaction which is affected by a substantial conflict of interest is voidable unless the transaction is approved by the court after notice to interested persons and others as directed by the court.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.270

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.535.
Persons dealing with conservators; protection.

A person who in good faith either assists a conservator or deals with the conservator for value in any transaction other than those requiring a court order as provided in AS

13.26.435

, is protected as if the conservator properly exercised the power. The fact that a person knowingly deals with a conservator does not alone require the person to inquire into the existence of a power or the propriety of its exercise, except that restrictions on powers of conservators which are endorsed on letters as provided in AS

13.26.550

are effective as to third persons.
A person is not bound to see to the proper application of estate assets paid or delivered to a conservator.
The protection here expressed extends to instances in which some procedural irregularity or jurisdictional defect occurred in proceedings leading to the issuance of letters.
The protection here expressed is not by substitution for that provided by comparable provisions of the laws relating to commercial transactions and laws simplifying transfers of securities by fiduciaries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.275

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.435

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.200” and “AS

13.26.550

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.290

”.

Sec. 13.26.540.
Powers of conservator in administration.

A conservator has all of the powers conferred herein and any additional powers conferred by law on trustees in this state. In addition, a conservator of the estate of an unmarried minor, as to whom no one has parental rights, has the duties and powers of a guardian of a minor described in AS

13.26.167

until the minor attains the age of 18 or marries, but the parental rights so conferred on a conservator do not preclude appointment of a guardian as provided by AS

13.26.101

—

13.26.186

.

A conservator has power without court authorization or confirmation, to invest and reinvest funds of the estate as would a trustee.

A conservator, acting reasonably in efforts to accomplish the purpose for which the conservator was appointed, may act, without court authorization or confirmation, to

collect, hold and retain assets of the estate including land in another state, until, in the conservator’s judgment, disposition of the assets should be made, and the assets may be retained even though they include an asset in which the conservator is personally interested;

receive additions to the estate;

continue or participate in the operation of any business or other enterprise;

acquire an undivided interest in an estate asset in which the conservator, in any fiduciary capacity, holds an undivided interest;

invest and reinvest estate assets in accordance with (b) of this section;

deposit estate funds in a bank including a bank operated by the conservator;

acquire or dispose of an estate asset including land in another state for cash or on credit, at public or private sale; and to manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon an estate asset;

make ordinary or extraordinary repairs or alterations in buildings or other structures, to demolish any improvements, to raze existing or erect new party walls or buildings;

subdivide, develop, or dedicate land to public use; to make or obtain the vacation of plats and adjust boundaries; to adjust differences in valuation on exchange or to partition by giving or receiving considerations; and to dedicate easements to public use without consideration;

enter for any purpose into a lease as lessor or lessee with or without option to purchase or renew for a term within or extending beyond the term of the conservatorship;

enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of minerals or other natural resources or enter into a pooling or unitization agreement;

grant an option involving disposition of an estate asset, to take an option for the acquisition of any asset;

vote a security, in person or by general or limited proxy;

pay calls, assessments, and any other sums chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities;

sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; to consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the conservatorship so that title to the security may pass by delivery, but the conservator is liable for any act of the nominee in connection with the stock so held;

insure the assets of the estate against damage or loss, and the conservator against liability with respect to third persons;

borrow money to be repaid from estate assets or otherwise; to advance money for the protection of the estate or the protected person, and for all expenses, losses, and liability sustained in the administration of the estate or because of the holding or ownership of any estate assets, and the conservator has a lien on the estate as against the protected person from advances so made;

pay or contest any claim; to settle a claim by or against the estate or the protected person by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise; and to release, in whole or in part, any claim belonging to the estate to the extent that the claim is uncollectible;

pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the conservator, and other expenses incurred in the collection, care, administration, and protection of the estate;

allocate items of income or expense to either estate income or principal, as provided by law, including creation of reserves out of income for depreciation, obsolescence, or amortization, or for depletion in mineral or timber properties;

pay any sum distributable to a protected person or the protected person’s dependent, without liability to the conservator, by paying the sum to the distributee or by paying the sum for the use of the distributee either to the distributee’s guardian or if none, to a relative or other person with custody of the distributee’s person;

employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisors, or agents, even though they are associated with the conservator to advise or assist the conservator in the performance of administrative duties; to act upon their recommendation without independent investigation; and instead of acting personally, to employ one or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary;

prosecute or defend actions, claims or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of estate assets and of the conservator in the performance of duties; and

execute and deliver all instruments which will accomplish or facilitate the exercise of the powers vested in the conservator.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am §§ 29, 30 ch 56 SLA 1973; am § 7 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.280

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.167

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.070

”, and “AS

13.26.101

—

13.26.186

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.030 — 13.26.085”.

Sec. 13.26.545.
Distributive duties and powers of conservator.

A conservator may expend or distribute income or principal of the estate without court authorization or confirmation for the support, education, care, or benefit of the protected person and the protected person’s dependents in accordance with the following principles:

the conservator is to consider recommendations relating to the appropriate standard of support, education, and benefit for the protected person made by a parent or guardian, if any; the conservator may not be surcharged for sums paid to persons or organizations actually furnishing support, education, or care to the protected person pursuant to the recommendations of a parent or guardian of the protected person unless the conservator knows that the parent or guardian is deriving personal financial benefit therefrom, including relief from any personal duty of support, or unless the recommendations are clearly not in the best interests of the protected person;

the conservator is to expend or distribute sums reasonably necessary for the support, education, care, or benefit of the protected person with due regard to

the size of the estate, the probable duration of the conservatorship, and the likelihood that the protected person, at some future time, may be fully able to manage the protected person’s affairs and the estate which has been conserved;

the accustomed standard of living of the protected person and members of the protected person’s household;

other funds or sources used for the support of the protected person;

the conservator may expend funds of the estate for the support of persons legally dependent on the protected person and others who are members of the protected person’s household who are unable to support themselves and who are in need of support;

funds expended under this subsection may be paid by the conservator to any person, including the protected person to reimburse for expenditures which the conservator might have made, or in advance for services to be rendered to the protected person when it is reasonable to expect that they will be performed and where advance payments are customary or reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

If the estate is ample to provide for the purposes implicit in the distributions authorized by (a) of this section, a conservator for a protected person other than a minor has power to make gifts to charity and other objects as the protected person might have been expected to make, in amounts which do not exceed in total for any year 20 percent of the income from the estate.

When a minor who has not been adjudged disabled under AS

13.26.401

(2) attains majority, the conservator, after meeting all prior claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the former protected person as soon as possible.

When the conservator is satisfied that a protected person’s disability (other than minority) has ceased, the conservator, after meeting all prior claims and expenses of administration, shall pay over and distribute all funds and properties to the formerly protected person as soon as possible.

If a protected person dies, the conservator shall deliver to the court for safekeeping any will of the deceased protected person that may have come into the conservator’s possession and inform the executor or a beneficiary named in the will that the will has been so delivered. Once a conservator knows that the protected person has died, the conservator may not exercise authority over the protected person’s affairs and estate except to pay reasonable burial expenses and to preserve, account for, and transfer control of assets to a personal representative, a temporary property custodian appointed by the court, or a person authorized to take custody of personal property by affidavit under AS

13.16.680

. If, after 40 days from the death of the protected person, no other person has been appointed personal representative and no application or petition for appointment is before the court, the conservator may apply to exercise the powers and duties of a personal representative in order to proceed with administering and distributing the decedent’s estate without additional or further appointment. Upon application for an order granting the powers of a personal representative to a conservator, after notice to any person demanding notice under AS

13.16.070

and to any person nominated executor in any will of which the applicant is aware, the court may order the conferral of the power upon determining that there is no objection, and endorse the letters of the conservator to note that the formerly protected person is deceased and that the conservator has acquired all of the powers and duties of a personal representative. The making and entry of an order under this section has the effect of an order of appointment of a personal representative as provided in AS

13.16.115

and

13.16.245

—

13.16.655

except that estate in the name of the conservator, after administration, may be distributed to the decedent’s successors without prior retransfer to the conservator as personal representative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 25 ch 84 SLA 2004)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.285

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

(2)” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

(2)”.

Sec. 13.26.550.
Enlargement or limitation of powers of conservator.

Subject to the restrictions in AS

13.26.435

(4), the court may confer on a conservator at the time of appointment or later, in addition to the powers conferred by AS

13.26.540

and

13.26.545

, any power which the court itself could exercise under AS

13.26.435

(2) and (3).
The court may, at the time of appointment or later, limit the powers of a conservator otherwise conferred by AS

13.26.540

and

13.26.545

or previously conferred by the court, and may at any time relieve the conservator of any limitation.
If the court limits any power conferred on the conservator by AS 13.26.540 and 13.26.545, the limitation shall be endorsed upon the letters of appointment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.290

; renumbered in 2016 at which time numerous cross references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Sec. 13.26.555.
Preservation of estate plan.

In investing the estate, and in selecting assets of the estate for distribution under AS

13.26.545(a)

and (b), in utilizing powers of revocation or withdrawal available for the support of the protected person, and exercisable by the conservator or the court, the conservator and the court should take into account any known estate plan of the protected person, including a will, any revocable trust of which the protected person is settlor, and any contract, transfer, or joint ownership arrangement with provisions for payment or transfer of benefits or interests at death to another or others which the protected person may have originated. The conservator may examine the will of the protected person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.295

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.545(a)

and (b)” was substituted for “AS 13.26.285(a) and (b)”.

Sec. 13.26.560.
Claims against estate and protected person; enforcement.

Subject to AS

13.26.545(e)

, a conservator shall pay from the estate all just claims against the estate and against the protected person arising before or after the conservatorship was established upon their presentation and allowance. A claim is considered presented on the first to occur of receipt of the written statement of claim by the conservator or the filing of the claim with the court. A presented claim is allowed if it is not disallowed by written statement mailed by the conservator to the claimant within 60 days after its presentation. The presentation of a claim tolls any statute of limitations relating to the claim until 30 days after its disallowance. A claim may be presented by either of the following methods:

the claimant may deliver or mail to the conservator a written statement of the claim indicating its basis, the name and address of the claimant, and the amount claimed;

the claimant may file a written statement of the claim, in the form prescribed by rule, with the clerk of the court and deliver or mail a copy of the statement to the conservator.

A claimant whose claim has not been paid may petition the court for determination of the claim at any time before it is barred by the applicable statute of limitation, and, upon due proof, procure an order for its allowance and payment from the estate. If a proceeding is pending against a protected person at the time of appointment of a conservator or is initiated against the protected person thereafter, the moving party must give notice of the proceeding to the conservator if the outcome is to constitute a claim against the estate.

If it appears that the estate in a conservatorship is likely to be exhausted before all existing claims are paid, preference is to be given to prior claims for the care, maintenance, and education of the protected person or the protected person’s dependents and existing claims for expenses of administration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 31 ch 56 SLA 1973; am § 26 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 25 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.300

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.545(e)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.285(e)”.

Sec. 13.26.565.
Individual liability of conservator.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a conservator is not individually liable on a contract properly entered into in a fiduciary capacity in the course of administration of the estate unless the conservator fails to reveal the representative capacity and identify the estate in the contract.

The conservator is individually liable for obligations arising from ownership or control of property of the estate or for torts committed in the course of administration of the estate only if personally at fault.

Claims based on contracts entered into by a conservator in a fiduciary capacity, on obligations arising from ownership or control of the estate, or on torts committed in the course of administration of the estate may be asserted against the estate by proceeding against the conservator in the fiduciary capacity, whether or not the conservator is individually liable for them.

Any question of liability between the estate and the conservator individually may be determined in a proceeding for accounting, surcharge, or indemnification, or other appropriate proceeding or action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.305

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.570.
Termination of proceeding.

The protected person, the protected person’s personal representative, the conservator, or any other interested person may petition the court to terminate the conservatorship.
A protected person seeking termination is entitled to the same rights and procedures as in an original proceeding for a protective order.
The court, upon determining after notice and hearing that the minority or disability of the protected person has ceased, may terminate the conservatorship.
Upon termination, title to assets of the estate passes to the former protected person or to the person’s successors subject to provision in the order for expenses of administration or to conveyances from the conservator to the former protected person or the person’s successors, to evidence the transfer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.310

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.575.
Payment of debt and delivery of property to foreign conservator without local proceedings.

Any person indebted to a protected person, or having possession of property or of an instrument evidencing a debt, stock, or chose in action belonging to a protected person may pay or deliver to a conservator, guardian of the estate, or other like fiduciary appointed by a court of the state of residence of the protected person, upon being presented with proof of the fiduciary’s appointment and an affidavit made by the fiduciary or on the fiduciary’s behalf stating:

that no protective proceeding relating to the protected person is pending in this state; and

that the foreign conservator is entitled to payment or to receive delivery.

If the person to whom the affidavit is presented is not aware of any protective proceeding pending in this state, payment or delivery in response to the demand and affidavit discharges the debtor or possessor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.315

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.580.
Foreign conservators.

If no local conservator has been appointed and no petition in a protective proceeding is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign conservator may file with a court in this state in a judicial district in which property belonging to the protected person is located, authenticated copies of appointment and of any official bond given.
Thereafter, the domiciliary foreign conservator may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local conservator and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

History.

(§ 32 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.320

; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.595.
Definitions.

In AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.595

, unless the context requires otherwise, “fraud” means

robbery, extortion, and coercion under AS

11.41.500

—

11.41.530

;

offenses against property under AS

11.46.100

—

11.46.740

; or

exploitation of another person or another person’s resources for personal profit or advantage if no significant benefit accrues to the person who is exploited.

History.

(§ 11 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.324; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.595

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

— 13.26.324”.